Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1536
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-1537 to 81-1548.04 shall be used.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 3.
September 30, 2025